North Carolina, session 2025, SB600.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART II. ALLOW RESIDENT TAXPAYERS TO ENROLL IN THE ORGAN AND
TISSUE DONATION PROGRAM VIA THEIR INCOME TAX RETURN
SECTION 2.(a) Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-153.8A. Organ and tissue donor election on income tax returns.
(a) The income tax return form furnished by the Secretary under G.S. 105-153.8 shall
include a section titled Organ and Tissue Donation Election, that allows a resident taxpayer to
elect to become a donor in accordance with Part 3A of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.
The organ and tissue donation section must:
(1) Provide the following options:
a. A fillable check box followed by the statement "Check here if resident
taxpayer authorizes an organ and tissue donation in the event of death.
Resident taxpayer's date of birth (mm-dd-yyyy)__-__-____"
b. A fillable check box followed by the statement "Check here if spouse
authorizes an organ and tissue donation in the event of death. Spouse's
date of birth (mm-dd-yyyy) __-__-____"
(2) Explain the resident taxpayer and spouse, if applicable, is authorizing an
anatomical gift of his or her organs, eyes, and tissue to take effect after the
donor's death.
(3) Explain the resident taxpayer is not required to record a response to the organ
and tissue donation election section to file an income tax return, pay taxes, or
receive a refund.
(4) Describe the process for amending or revoking the resident taxpayer's or
spouse's election to become an organ and tissue donor.
(b) The Secretary is authorized to request any information necessary from a resident
taxpayer or spouse within the organ and tissue donation election section of the income tax return
form to facilitate a resident taxpayer's or spouse's election as an organ and tissue donor in
accordance with Part 3A of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 105-259(b) is amended by adding the following new
subdivisions to read:
"(56) To furnish the Department of Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles,
with the information of an individual who has elected to become an organ and
tissue donor under G.S. 105-153.8A for purposes of making an anatomical
gift in accordance with Part 3A of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.
(57) To furnish any organ procurement organization and any organization
responsible for maintaining a list of individuals who have authorized an
anatomical gift with the information of an individual who has elected to
*S600-v-7*

become an organ and tissue donor under G.S. 105-153.8A for purposes of
making an anatomical gift in accordance with Part 3A of Chapter 130A of the
General Statutes."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 130A-412.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-412.7. Manner of making anatomical gift before donor's death.
(a) A donor may make an anatomical gift by any of the following methods:
(1) By authorizing that a statement or symbol be imprinted on the donor's drivers
license or identification card indicating that the donor has made an anatomical
gift. A donor who originally became a donor in another jurisdiction by this
method and applies for a drivers license or identification card in this State is
required to authorize that a statement or symbol be imprinted on the donor's
drivers license or identification card issued in this State in order for the
anatomical gift to be valid under this subdivision. Anatomical gifts made by
this method shall not include a donation of the donor's body.
(1a) By making an election on an income tax return in accordance with
G.S. 105-153.8A. Anatomical gifts made by this method shall not include a
donation of the donor's body.
(2) In a will.
(3) During a terminal illness or injury of the donor, by any form of
communication addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a
disinterested witness.
(4) As provided in subsection (b) of this section.
…
(c3) An election on an income tax return indicating that a donor has made an anatomical
gift is valid upon the filing of the return and shall remain valid until the donor revokes such
consent in the manner prescribed by G.S. 130A-412.8.
…."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 20-43.2(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Personally identifiable information on a donor registry about a donor or prospective
donor may not be used or disclosed without the express consent of the donor, prospective donor,
or person that made the anatomical gift for any purpose other than to determine, at or near death
of the donor or prospective donor, whether the donor or prospective donor has made, amended,
or revoked an anatomical gift.gift, or to determine the statistical and demographic makeup of
individuals who have and have not authorized an anatomical gift so organ procurement
organizations may advocate for donation."
SECTION 2.(e) The Department of Revenue and the Department of Transportation,
Division of Motor Vehicles, shall coordinate to continuously update the Organ Donor Registry
under G.S. 20-43.2 and shall coordinate for any other purposes consistent with and necessary to
the fulfillment of the objectives of this Part.
SECTION 2.1.(a) By January 1, 2027, the Department of Revenue must adopt rules
necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this Part.
SECTION 2.1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.
SECTION 2.2. Except as otherwise provided, this Part is effective on January 1,
2027, and for tax returns for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
PART III. PROHIBIT THE MANUFACTURING, SELLING, AND DISTRIBUTING OF
INTRAVENOUS SOLUTION CONTAINERS AND INTRAVENOUS TUBING
INTENTIONALLY MADE WITH DEHP
SECTION 3.(a) Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read as follows:
"Article 19C.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-60 Senate Bill 600

"DEHP Hazard Management.
"§ 130A-453.33. Legislative finding.
The General Assembly finds all of the following:
(1) DEHP and other ortho-phthalates are toxic chemicals used primarily to
produce flexibility in plastics, mainly polyvinyl chloride (PVC).
(2) DEHP is the most common plasticizer used in medical devices, including
intravenous solution containers, which are also known as IV bags, and
intravenous tubing.
(3) Over the course of its shelf life, DEHP leaches from IV bags and tubing made
from DEHP into the solutions being held in the medical devices.
(4) DEHP is classified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as
an endocrine-disrupting compound since it can:
a. Interfere with the hormonal system in humans and animals.
b. Mimic or block the actions of hormones, leading to adverse effects on
reproductive health, development, and metabolism.
(5) DEHP exposure has been associated with adverse effects on reproductive
organs and fertility. DEHP can also disrupt normal reproductive development,
reduce sperm quality, and affect hormone levels in both males and females.
(6) DEHP is metabolized in the liver and can accumulate in the body over time.
Prolonged exposure to high levels of DEHP has been shown to cause liver and
kidney damage in animal studies.
(7) Inhalation or ingestion of DEHP can cause respiratory irritation and allergic
reactions in some individuals, particularly those with preexisting respiratory
conditions or sensitivities.
(8) Studies have suggested a potential link between DEHP exposure and certain
types of cancer, including breast, liver, lung, and testicular cancer.
(9) The United States Environmental Protection Agency has determined that
DEHP is a probable human carcinogen.
(10) The leaching of DEHP from medical devices at varying concentrations has
been linked to multidrug resistance in breast cancer cells, inhibiting the
effectiveness of breast cancer drugs. This phenomenon has been observed at
both high and low concentrations of DEHP, highlighting the potential impact
of DEHP leaching on cancer treatment outcomes.
(11) Exposure to DEHP has been linked to multidrug resistance in triple-negative
breast cancer cells, inhibiting the apoptosis mechanism induced by breast
cancer drugs, such as tamoxifen, and increasing cell proliferation.
(12) DEHP has been suggested to serve as a mitogenic factor for estrogen
receptor-positive breast cancer cells, potentially making them multidrug
resistant.
"§ 130A-453.34. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) DEHP. – Di(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate.
(2) Health care practitioner. – An individual who is authorized to practice some
component of the healing arts by a license, permit, certificate, or registration
issued by a State licensing agency or board.
(3) Intentionally added DEHP. – DEHP that a manufacturer has intentionally
added to a product and that has a functional or technical effect on the product.
(4) Intravenous solution container. – A container used to house medicine, fluid,
or nutrition therapy that is intravenously delivered to a patient in a hospital,
outpatient facility, or other health care facility.
Senate Bill 600 Session Law 2025-60 Page 3

(5) Intravenous tubing. – Tubing used to intravenously administer fluids,
medication, or nutrients directly to an adult, child, or infant.
(6) Ortho-phthalate. – A class of chemicals that are esters of ortho-phthalic acid,
including DEHP or any of the following:
a. Benzyl butyl phthalate (BBP).
b. Dibutyl phthalate (DBP).
c. Dicyclohexyl phthalate (DCHP).
d. Diethyl phthalate (DEP).
e. Diisobutyl phthalate (DIBP).
f. Diisodecyl phthalate (DIDP).
g. Diisononyl phthalate (DINP).
h. Di-n-hexyl phthalate (DnHP).
i. Di-n-octyl phthalate (DNOP).
j. Di-n-pentyl phthalate (DnPP).
k. Diisoheptyl phthalate (DIHP).
(7) Unintentionally added DEHP. – DEHP in an intravenous solution container
or intravenous tubing product that is not used for functional or technical effect
on the product.
"§ 130A-453.35. Prohibitions.
(a) Intravenous Solution Containers. – Beginning January 1, 2030, a person or entity shall
not sell or distribute into commerce in the State of North Carolina intravenous solution containers
made with intentionally added DEHP.
(b) Intravenous Tubing. – Beginning January 1, 2035, a person or entity shall not
manufacture, sell, or distribute into commerce in the State of North Carolina intravenous tubing
made with intentionally added DEHP.
(c) Replacement. – A person may not replace DEHP, pursuant to this Article, with
another ortho-phthalate in a new or revised medical device.
(d) Maximum Quantity. – An intravenous solution container or intravenous tubing
product shall not have unintentionally added DEHP present at a quantity at or above 0.1 percent
weight per weight (w/w).
(e) Exemptions. – The following items, as described in Title 21 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, are exempt from these provisions:
(1) Human blood collection and storage bags.
(2) Apheresis and cell therapy blood kits and bags, including integral tubing.
(f) Delayed Compliance. – A person or entity, due to pending United States Food and
Drug Administration approval for the DEHP-free intravenous solution container or due to the
manufacturer not having adequate equipment to manufacture the DEHP-free intravenous solution
container, shall meet the requirement in subsection (a) of this section by January 1, 2032, if all
of the following conditions are met:
(1) The person or entity notified its North Carolina customers, no later than
October 1, 2025, that it has commenced development of the DEHP-free
intravenous solution container to meet the requirements of this section.
(2) The person or entity provides notice to its customers and posts to its official
internet website, no later than January 1, 2028, that it will not meet the
deadline imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 130A-22(b3) reads as rewritten:
"(b3) The Secretary may impose an administrative penalty on a person who violates Article
19A or 19B Article 19A, 19B, or 19C of this Chapter or any rules adopted pursuant to Article
19A or 19B Article 19A, 19B, or 19C of this Chapter. Each day of a continuing violation is a
separate violation. The penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the
violation continues for Article 19A of this Chapter. The penalty shall not exceed five thousand
Page 4 Session Law 2025-60 Senate Bill 600

dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation continues for Article 19B of this Chapter. The penalty
shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation continues for Article
19C of this Chapter. The penalty authorized by this section does not apply to a person who is not
required to be certified under Article 19A or 19B."
SECTION 3.(c) Except as otherwise provided, this Part is effective when it becomes
law.
PART IV. ALLOW THE USE OF EPINEPHRINE NASAL SPRAY IN ADDITION TO
AUTO-INJECTORS
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 115C-375.2(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Local boards of education shall adopt a policy authorizing a student with asthma or a
student subject to anaphylactic reactions, or both, to possess and self-administer asthma
medication on school property during the school day, at school-sponsored activities, or while in
transit to or from school or school-sponsored events. As used in this section, "asthma medication"
means a medicine prescribed for the treatment of asthma or anaphylactic reactions and includes
a prescribed asthma inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector. delivery system. The policy shall
include a requirement that the student's parent or guardian provide to the school:
…."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 115C-375.2A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-375.2A. School supply of epinephrine auto-injectors.delivery systems.
(a) A local board of education shall provide for a supply of emergency epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems on school property for use by trained school personnel to provide
emergency medical aid to persons suffering from an anaphylactic reaction during the school day
and at school-sponsored events on school property. Each school shall store in a secure but
unlocked and easily accessible location a minimum of two epinephrine auto-injectors. delivery
systems. For purposes of this section, "school property" does not include transportation to or
from school.
(b) For the purposes of this section and G.S. 115C-375.2, "epinephrine auto-injector"
delivery system" means a disposable drug delivery system with a spring-activated, concealed
needle that is designed for emergency administration of epinephrine to provide rapid, convenient
first aid for persons suffering a potentially fatal reaction to anaphylaxis.anaphylaxis, including
nasal sprays and injectors that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration
with a premeasured, appropriate weight-based dose of epinephrine.
(c) The principal shall designate one or more school personnel, as part of the medical
care program under G.S. 115C-375.1, to receive initial training and annual retraining from a
school nurse or qualified representative of the local health department regarding the storage and
emergency use of an epinephrine auto-injector. delivery systems. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, the school nurse or other designated school personnel who has
received training under this subsection shall obtain a non-patient specific prescription for an
epinephrine auto-injectors delivery system from a physician, physician assistant, or nurse
practitioner of the local health department serving the area in which the local school
administrative unit is located.
(d) The principal shall collaborate with appropriate school personnel to develop an
emergency action plan for the use of epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems in an
emergency. The plan shall include at least the following components:
(1) Standards and procedures for the storage and emergency use of epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems by trained school personnel.
(2) Training of school personnel in recognizing symptoms of anaphylaxis.
(3) Emergency follow-up procedures, including calling emergency services and
contacting a student's parent and parent, guardian, and physician.
(4) Instruction and certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
Senate Bill 600 Session Law 2025-60 Page 5

(e) A supply of emergency epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems provided in
accordance with this section shall not be used as the sole medication supply for students known
to have a medical condition requiring the availability or use of an epinephrine auto-injector.
delivery system. Those students may be authorized to possess and self-administer their
medication on school property under G.S. 115C-375.2.
…."
SECTION 4.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.75. General operating requirements.
(a) Health and Safety Standards. – A charter school shall meet the same health and safety
requirements required of a local school administrative unit. unit, including the following:
(1) The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that charter schools provide
parents and guardians with information about meningococcal meningitis and
influenza and their vaccines at the beginning of every school year. This
information shall include the causes, symptoms, and how meningococcal
meningitis and influenza are spread and the places where parents and
guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their
children.
(2) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that charter schools
provide parents and guardians with information about cervical cancer, cervical
dysplasia, human papillomavirus, and the vaccines available to prevent these
diseases. This information shall be provided at the beginning of the school
year to parents of children entering grades five through 12. This information
shall include the causes and symptoms of these diseases, how they are
transmitted, how they may be prevented by vaccination, including the benefits
and possible side effects of vaccination, and the places where parents and
guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their
children.
(3) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that charter schools
provide students in grades seven through 12 with information annually on the
preventable risks for preterm birth in subsequent pregnancies, including
induced abortion, smoking, alcohol consumption, the use of illicit drugs, and
inadequate prenatal care.
(4) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that charter schools
provide students in grades nine through 12 with information annually on the
manner in which a parent may lawfully abandon a newborn baby with a
responsible person, in accordance with Article 5A of Chapter 7B of the
General Statutes.
(5) The Department of Public Instruction shall also ensure that the guidelines for
individual diabetes care plans adopted by the State Board of Education under
G.S. 115C-12(31) are implemented in charter schools in which students with
diabetes are enrolled and that charter schools otherwise comply with
G.S. 115C-375.3.
(6) The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that charter schools comply
with G.S. 115C-375.2A. The board of directors of a charter school shall
provide the school with a supply of emergency epinephrine auto-injectors
delivery systems necessary to meet the requirements of G.S. 115C-375.2A."
SECTION 4.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66(7) reads as rewritten:
"(7) Health and safety. – The board of directors shall require that the regional
school meet the same health and safety standards required of a local school
administrative unit.
Page 6 Session Law 2025-60 Senate Bill 600

The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that regional schools
comply with G.S. 115C-375.2A. The board of directors of a regional school
shall provide the school with a supply of emergency epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems necessary to carry out the provisions of
G.S. 115C-375.2A."
SECTION 4.(e) G.S. 116-239.8(b)(9) reads as rewritten:
"(9) Health and safety. – The chancellor shall require that the laboratory school
meet the same health and safety standards required of a local school
administrative unit. The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that
laboratory schools comply with G.S. 115C-375.2A. The chancellor shall
provide the laboratory school with a supply of emergency epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems necessary to carry out the provisions of
G.S. 115C-375.2A."
SECTION 4.(f) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 90-21.15A reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-21.15A. Emergency treatment using epinephrine auto-injector; delivery systems;
immunity.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Administer. – The direct application of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery
system to the body of an individual.
(2) Authorized entity. – Any entity or organization, other than a school described
in G.S. 115C-375.2A, at which allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may
be present, including, but not limited to, recreation camps, colleges,
universities, day care facilities, youth sports leagues, amusement parks,
restaurants, places of employment, and sports arenas. An authorized entity
shall also include any person, corporation, or other entity that owns or operates
any entity or organization listed.
(3) Epinephrine auto-injector. delivery system. – A single-use device used for the
automatic injection of a premeasured dose of disposable drug delivery system
that is designed for emergency administration of epinephrine into the human
body.to provide rapid, convenient first aid for persons suffering a potentially
fatal reaction to anaphylaxis, including nasal sprays and injectors that are
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration with a
premeasured, appropriate weight-based dose of epinephrine.
(4) Health care provider. – A health care provider licensed to prescribe drugs
under the laws of this State.
(5) Provide. – To supply one or more epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems
to an individual.
(b) Prescribing to Authorized Entities Permitted. – A health care provider may prescribe
epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems in the name of an authorized entity for use in
accordance with this section, and pharmacists and health care providers may dispense
epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems pursuant to a prescription issued in the name of an
authorized entity. A prescription issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for no more than
two years.
(c) Authorized Entities Permitted to Maintain Supply. – An authorized entity may acquire
and stock a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems pursuant to a prescription
issued in accordance with this section. An authorized entity that acquires and stocks epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems shall make a good-faith effort to store the supply of epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems in accordance with the epinephrine auto-injector delivery system
manufacturer's instructions for use and any additional requirements that may be established by
Senate Bill 600 Session Law 2025-60 Page 7

the Department of Health and Human Services. An authorized entity that acquires and stocks a
supply of epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems pursuant to a prescription issued in
accordance with this section shall designate employees or agents to be responsible for the storage,
maintenance, control, and general oversight of epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems
acquired by the authorized entity.
(d) Use of Epinephrine Auto-Injectors Delivery Systems by Authorized Entities. – An
employee or agent of an authorized entity or other individual who has completed the training
required by subsection (e) of this section may use epinephrine auto-injectors prescribed pursuant
to G.S. 90-726.1 delivery systems to do any of the following:
(1) Provide an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to any individual who
the employee, agent, or other individual believes in good faith is experiencing
anaphylaxis, or a person believed in good faith to be the parent, guardian, or
caregiver of such individual, for immediate administration, regardless of
whether the individual has a prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector
delivery system or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy.
(2) Administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to any individual
who the employee, agent, or other individual believes in good faith is
experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the individual has a
prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system or has previously
been diagnosed with an allergy.
(e) Mandatory Training Program. – An authorized entity that elects to acquire and stock
a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems as described in subsection (c) of this
section shall designate employees or agents to complete an anaphylaxis training program. The
training may be conducted online or in person and shall, at a minimum, include all of the
following components:
(1) How to recognize signs and symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including
anaphylaxis.
(2) Standards and procedures for the storage and administration of an epinephrine
auto-injector.delivery system.
(3) Emergency follow-up procedures.
In-person training shall cover the three components listed in this subsection and be conducted
by (i) a physician, physician assistant, or registered nurse licensed to practice in this State; (ii) a
nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health
treatment; or (iii) an entity or individual approved by the Department of Health and Human
Services.
Online training shall cover the three components listed in this subsection and be offered (i)
by a nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health
treatment; (ii) by an entity or individual approved by the Department of Health and Human
Services; or (iii) by means of an online training course that has been approved by another state.
(f) Immunity. –
(1) The following persons are immune from criminal liability and from suit in any
civil action brought by any person for injuries or related damages that result
from any act or omission taken pursuant to this section:
a. Any authorized entity that voluntarily and without expectation of
payment possesses and makes available epinephrine
auto-injectors.delivery systems.
b. Any employee or agent of an authorized entity, or any other individual,
who provides or administers an epinephrine auto-injector delivery
system to an individual whom the employee, agent, or other individual
believes in good faith is experiencing symptoms of anaphylaxis and
Page 8 Session Law 2025-60 Senate Bill 600

has completed the required training set forth in subsection (e) of this
section.
c. A health care provider that prescribes epinephrine auto-injectors
delivery systems to an authorized entity.
d. A pharmacist or health care provider that dispenses epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems to an authorized entity.
e. Any individual or entity that conducts the training mandated by
subsection (e) of this section.
(2) The immunity conferred by this section does not apply to acts or omissions
constituting willful or wanton conduct as defined in G.S. 1D-5(7) or
intentional wrongdoing.
(3) Nothing in this section creates or imposes any duty, obligation, or basis for
liability on any authorized entity, any employee or agent of an authorized
entity, or any other individual to acquire, possess, store, make available, or
administer an epinephrine auto-injector.delivery system.
(4) This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense
that may be available under State law, including the protections set forth in
G.S. 90-21.14.
(g) Liability for Acts Outside of This State. – An authorized entity located in this State
shall not be liable under the laws of this State for any injuries or related damages resulting from
the provision or administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system outside of this
State under either of the following circumstances:
(1) If the authorized entity would not have been liable for such injuries or related
damages if the epinephrine auto-injector delivery system had been provided
or administered within this State.
(2) If the authorized entity is not liable for such injuries or related damages under
the laws of the state in which the epinephrine auto-injector delivery system
was provided or administered.
(h) Does Not Constitute Practice of Medicine. – The administration of an epinephrine
auto-injector delivery system in accordance with this section is not the practice of medicine or
any other profession that otherwise requires licensure."
SECTION 4.2. Except as otherwise provided, this Part is effective when it becomes
law.
PART V. REGISTERED NURSES IN SCHOOLS
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 115C-315(d2) reads as rewritten:
"(d2) School Nurses. – The State Board of Education, in accordance with subsection (d) of
this section, may shall adopt rules to establish the qualifications and training required to be hired
or contracted for as a certified school nurse except the subject to the following:
(1) The Board may shall not require or impose a requirement that would require
a school nurse to obtain a four-year degree as a condition of
employment.degree.
(2) The Board shall require that a school nurse who meets all of the following
criteria be paid under the certified school nurse pay scale as established by the
Board:
a. Is a registered nurse licensed under Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes.
b. Has at least two years of experience serving in a hospital or health
clinic."
SECTION 5.(b) The State Board of Education has authority to adopt temporary rules
to enact the provisions of this Part until such a time as permanent rules can be adopted.
Senate Bill 600 Session Law 2025-60 Page 9

SECTION 5.(c) The Department of Public Instruction shall conform any salary
manuals with the provisions of this Part.
SECTION 5.(d) This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to school
nurses hired or contracted for as a school nurse on or after that date.
PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 9:23 a.m. this 3rd day of July, 2025
Page 10 Session Law 2025-60 Senate Bill 600